Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 22. General Mechanics’ Lien
38-22-113.
Hearing - judgment - summons - defense.

The court, whenever the issues in such case are made up, shall advance such cause to the head of the docket for trial and may proceed to hear and determine said liens and claims or may refer the same to a magistrate to ascertain and report upon said liens and claims and the amounts justly due thereon.

Judgments shall be rendered according to the rights of the parties. The various rights of all the lien claimants and other parties to any such action shall be determined and incorporated in one judgment or decree. Each party who establishes his claim under this article shall have judgment against the party personally liable to him for the full amount of his claim so established, and shall have a lien established and determined in said decree upon the property to which his lien has attached to the extent stated in this section.

Proceedings to foreclose and enforce mechanics’ liens under this article are actions in rem, and service by publication may be obtained against any defendant therein in a manner as provided by law, and personal judgment against the principal contractor or other person personally liable for the debt for which the lien is claimed shall not be requisite to a decree of foreclosure in favor of a subcontractor or materialman.

In such proceedings, it shall be an affirmative defense that the owner or some person acting on the owner’s behalf has paid an amount sufficient to satisfy the contractual and legal obligations of the owner, including the initial purchase price or contract amount plus any additions or change orders, to the principal contractor or any subcontractor for the purpose of payment to the subcontractors or suppliers of laborers or materials or services to the job, when:

The property is an existing single-family dwelling unit;

The property is a residence constructed by the owner or under a contract entered into by the owner prior to its occupancy as his primary residence; or

The property is a single-family, owner-occupied dwelling unit, including a residence constructed and sold for occupancy as a primary residence. This paragraph (c) shall not apply to a developer or builder of multiple residences except for the residence that is occupied as the primary residence of the developer or builder.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 273, § 13.

R.S. 08:

§ 4037.

C.L.

§ 6454.

CSA:

C. 101, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-13.

L. 87:

(4) added, p. 1336, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 366, § 42, effective April 9.

L. 2000:

IP(4) amended, p. 210, § 10, effective August 2.

38-22-114.
Disposition of proceeds - execution.

The court shall cause said property to be sold in satisfaction of said liens and costs of suit as in case of foreclosure of mortgages; and any party in whose favor a judgment for a lien is rendered, may cause the property to be sold within the time and in the manner provided for sales of real estate on executions issued out of any court of record, and there shall be the same rights of redemption as are provided for in the case of sales of real estate on executions. And if the proceeds of such sale, after the payment of costs, are not sufficient to satisfy the whole amount of such liens included in the decree of sale, then such proceeds shall be apportioned according to the rights of the several parties. In case the proceeds of sale amount to more than the sum of said liens and all costs, then the remainder shall be paid over to the owner of said property; and each party whose claim is not fully satisfied in the manner provided in this section shall have execution for the balance unsatisfied against the party personally liable, as in other cases.

In the first instance without a previous sale of said property to which such liens have attached, an execution may issue in behalf of any such lien claimant for the full amount of his claim against the party personally liable, and he may thereafter enforce such lien for any balance of such judgment remaining unsatisfied. A transcript of the docket of said judgment and decree may be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county where such property is situated or in any other county, and thereupon said judgment and decree shall become a lien upon the real property in such county of each party so personally liable in favor of any such lien claimant holding any such judgment against any such party so personally liable, as in other cases of recording transcripts of judgment.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 274, § 14.

R.S. 08:

§ 4038.

C.L.

§ 6455.

CSA:

C. 101, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-14.

38-22-115.
Parties to action.

Principal contractors and all other persons personally liable for the debt for which the lien is claimed shall be made parties to actions to enforce liens under this article, and service of summons shall be made either personally or by publication in the same manner and with like effect as is provided by law in cases of attachment and other proceedings in rem.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 274, § 15.

R.S. 08:

§ 4039.

C.L.

§ 6456.

CSA:

C. 101, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-15.

38-22-116.
Costs.

The court shall divide the costs between the parties liable therefor, according to the justice of the case.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 275, § 16.

R.S. 08:

§ 4040.

C.L.

§ 6457.

CSA:

C. 101, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-16.

38-22-117.
Assignment of lien - failure to support lien.

Any party claiming a lien may assign in writing his claim and lien to any other claimant or other person who shall thereupon have all the rights and remedies of the assignor for the purpose of filing and for the enforcement of any such lien by action under this article, and the assignment shall be a sufficient consideration as to all other parties for the purpose of such action. Such assignment may be made before or after the filing of the statement of lien. Any such claimant, whether as assignee or otherwise, may include all the liens he may possess against the same property in any such statement, and when more than one such claim is included in one such statement, one verification thereto shall be sufficient. Any person may file separate statements of two or more claims. If, on the trial of a cause under the provisions of this article, the proceedings will not support a lien, the plaintiff and all lien claimants entitled thereto may proceed to judgment as in an action on contract, and executions may issue as provided in such cases, and said judgment shall have all the rights of a judgment in a personal action.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 275, § 17.

R.S. 08:

§ 4041.

C.L.

§ 6458.

CSA:

C. 101, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-17.

38-22-118.
Satisfaction of lien - failure to release.

The claimant of any such lien, the statement of which has been filed, on the payment of the amount thereof, together with the costs of filing and recording such lien, and the acknowledgment of satisfaction, and accrued costs of suit in case a suit has been brought thereon, at the request of any person interested in the property charged therewith, shall enter or cause to be entered an acknowledgment of satisfaction of the same of record, and if he neglects or refuses to do so within ten days after the written request of any person so interested, he shall forfeit and pay to such person the sum of ten dollars per day for every day of such neglect or refusal, to be recovered in the same manner as other debts. A valid tender of payment, refused by any such claimant, shall be equivalent to a payment for the purpose of this section. Any such statement may be satisfied of record in the same manner as mortgages.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 275, § 18.

R.S. 08:

§ 4042.

C.L.

§ 6459.

CSA:

C. 101, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-18.

38-22-119.
Agreement to waive - effect.

No agreement to waive, abandon, or refrain from enforcing any lien provided for by this article shall be binding except as between the parties to such contract. The provisions of this article shall receive a liberal construction in all cases.

An agreement to waive lien rights shall contain a statement, by the person waiving lien rights, providing in substance that all debts owed to any third party by the person waiving the lien rights and relating to the goods or services covered by the waiver of lien rights have been paid or will be timely paid.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 276, § 19.

R.S. 08:

§ 4043.

C.L.

§ 6460.

CSA:

C. 101, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-19.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-137), ch. 145, p. 610, § 2, effective July 1.

38-22-120.
Rules of civil procedure apply.

The provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, insofar as the same are applicable and not in conflict with the provisions of this article, shall be observed in proceedings to establish and enforce mechanics’ liens.

History.

Source: L. 1899:

P. 276, § 20.

R.S. 08:

§ 4044.

C.L.

§ 6461.

CSA:

C. 101, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-20.

38-22-121.
Liens of surveyors and engineers.

The provisions of this article shall apply to surveyors, civil and mining engineers doing any work of surveying or plotting of any mines, mining claims, lodes, or mineral deposits, and they shall have like lien and claim as other persons under the provisions of this article.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 227, § 8.

G.S.

§ 2138.

R.S. 08:

§ 4045.

C.L.

§ 6462.

CSA:

C. 101, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-21.

38-22-122.
Lien under two contracts - effect.

In case the act of doing such work or of furnishing such laborers or materials is continuous, said lien shall attach as in other cases, even though such work is done or laborers or materials have been furnished under two or more contracts between the same parties.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 230, § 17.

G.S.

§ 2147.

R.S. 08:

§ 4046.

C.L.

§ 6463.

CSA:

C. 101, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 210, § 11, effective August 2.

38-22-123.
Payment to avoid invalid.

No payment made by any owner to any contractor for the purpose of avoiding any anticipated lien of any subcontractor shall be valid; and if any person files either of said statements for a lien for a larger sum than is due or to become due, in fact, or in probability, as the case may be, with intent to cheat or defraud any other person, and that fact appears in any proceeding under this article, such person shall forfeit all rights to such lien under this article.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 235, § 29.

G.S.

§ 2159.

R.S. 08:

§ 4047.

C.L.

§ 6464.

CSA:

C. 101, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-23.

38-22-124.
Other remedies not barred.

No remedy given in this article shall be construed as preventing any person from enforcing any other remedy which he otherwise would have had, except as otherwise provided in this article. In case of two or more owners, contractors, or subcontractors interested in the same contract, the rule of procedure shall be the same as in the case of one such.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 236, § 31.

G.S.

§ 2161.

R.S. 08:

§ 4048.

C.L.

§ 6465.

CSA:

C. 101, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 86-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-24.

38-22-125.
Bona fide purchaser.

No lien, excepting those claimed by laborers or mechanics as defined in section 38-22-108 (1)(a), filed for record more than two months after completion of the building, improvement, or structure shall encumber the interest of any bona fide purchaser for value of real property, the principal improvement upon which is a single- or double-family dwelling, unless said purchaser at the time of conveyance has actual knowledge that the amounts due and secured by such lien have not been paid, or unless such lien statement has been recorded prior to conveyance, or unless a notice as provided in section 38-22-109 (10) has been filed within one month subsequent to completion or prior to conveyance, whichever is later; except that nothing in this section shall extend the time for recording lien statements as provided in section 38-22-109 (4), (5), and (10). For the purposes of this section, the dwelling shall be deemed complete upon conveyance and occupancy if not completed before. The lien for items of labor, work, or material which shall thereafter be furnished shall be effective and may be claimed within the time thereafter as provided in section 38-22-109 (4), (5), and (10), and their priority shall not be affected by this section.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 854, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-25.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1424, § 4, effective October 1.

38-22-126.
Disburser - notice - duty of owner and disburser.

For the purposes of this section, the word “disburser” means any lender who has agreed to make any loan to the owner or contractor, the proceeds of which are to be disbursed from time to time as work upon a structure or other improvement progresses, or any part of which is to be withheld until all or any part of such work is completed; or, any person who receives funds from any lender, contractor, or owner to be disbursed from time to time as work upon a structure or other improvement progresses, or any part of which is to be withheld until all or any part of such work is completed; or, any owner who has agreed to pay any sum to any contractor from time to time as work upon a structure or other improvement progresses, or any part of which is to be withheld until all or any part of such work is completed.

It is the duty of the disburser, prior to the first disbursement, to see that there has been recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the land to be improved is situated, a notice stating the name and address of the owner, the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the principal contractor, if any, and the disburser, and the legal description of the land and its address, if any. One notice may include as many parcels as desired, providing that all the information is stated as to each parcel. Such notice shall be indexed by the county clerk and recorder under the name of the owner and each principal contractor as grantors and according to address.

It is the duty of any person upon ordering or contracting for any labor, services, machinery, tools, equipment, laborers, or materials to be used as provided in section 38-22-101, upon demand of the person from whom he or she is so ordering or with whom he or she is so contracting, to furnish to such person a statement of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the owner or reputed owner of the land to be improved, the principal contractor, if any, and the disburser, if any, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, together with a legal description or the address, if any, of the land to be improved.

Any lien claimant who is entitled to a lien under this article may give notice to the disburser stating the property by address or legal description, or by such other description as will identify the real property; the claimant’s name, address, and telephone number; the person with whom he has contracted; and a general statement of his contract.

Such notice shall be in writing and shall be served upon the disburser by certified mail or by delivering the same personally to such disburser, or by leaving a copy at his residence or at his place of business with some person in charge.

Upon such notice being received by the disburser, it is the duty of the disburser, before disbursing any funds to the person designated in said notice with whom said claimant has contracted, to ascertain the amount due to the claimant on any disbursement date, and to pay such amount directly to the claimant out of any undisbursed funds available for and due to said person designated in said notice on such date; except that any amounts actually paid by the disburser to others for labor, services, machinery, tools, equipment, and laborers or materials performed, supplied, or furnished for such structure or improvement that are chargeable to said person designated in said notice shall not be deemed available for said person designated in said notice; and further except that if the amount claimed by said claimant is disputed by said person designated in said notice, the disburser may impound such amount until the amount due is settled by agreement or final judicial determination.

If the disburser fails to comply with subsection (6) of this section and the said claimant suffers loss by reason of said failure the disburser shall be liable to said claimant for the amount which the disburser should have paid claimant to the extent of claimant’s loss.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 854, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-3-26.

L. 2000:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 210, § 12, effective August 2.

38-22-127.
Moneys for lien claims made trust funds - disbursements - penalty.

All funds disbursed to any contractor or subcontractor under any building, construction, or remodeling contract or on any construction project shall be held in trust for the payment of the subcontractors, laborer or material suppliers, or laborers who have furnished laborers, materials, services, or labor, who have a lien, or may have a lien, against the property, or who claim, or may claim, against a principal and surety under the provisions of this article and for which such disbursement was made.

This section shall not be construed so as to require any such contractor or subcontractor to hold in trust any funds which have been disbursed to him or her for any subcontractor, laborer or material supplier, or laborer who claims a lien against the property or claims against a principal and surety who has furnished a bond under the provisions of this article if such contractor or subcontractor has a good faith belief that such lien or claim is not valid or if such contractor or subcontractor, in good faith, claims a setoff, to the extent of such setoff.

If the contractor or subcontractor has furnished a performance or payment bond or if the owner of the property has executed a written release to the contractor or subcontractor, he need not furnish any such bond or hold such payments or disbursements as trust funds, and the provisions of this section shall not apply.

Every contractor or subcontractor shall maintain separate records of account for each project or contract, but nothing contained in this section shall be construed as requiring a contractor or subcontractor to deposit trust funds from a single project in a separate bank account solely for that project so long as trust funds are not expended in a manner prohibited by this section.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section commits theft, as defined in section 18-4-401, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1420, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 211, § 13, effective August 2.

38-22-128.
Excessive amounts claimed.

Any person who files a lien under this article for an amount greater than is due without a reasonable possibility that said amount claimed is due and with the knowledge that said amount claimed is greater than that amount then due, and that fact is shown in any proceeding under this article, shall forfeit all rights to such lien plus such person shall be liable to the person against whom the lien was filed in an amount equal to the costs and all attorney’s fees.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1421, § 3, effective October 1.

38-22-129.
Principal contractor may provide bond prior to commencement of work.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the provisions of section 38-22-101 (1) shall not apply if, at the commencement of any work upon any construction project for the improvement of real property as described in section 38-22-101 (1), a performance bond and a labor and materials payment bond, each in an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent of the contract price, are executed by the principal contractor and one or more corporate sureties authorized and qualified to do business in this state, for the protection of all contractors, subcontractors, materialmen, and laborers supplying labor, laborers, or material in the prosecution of the work on such construction project for the use of each contractor, subcontractor, materialman, or laborer.

All subcontractors, materialmen, mechanics, and others who would otherwise be entitled to a lien under the provisions of section 38-22-101 (1) shall have a right of action directly against the principal contractor and his surety for the full amount due. Such action shall be brought within six months after completion of the last work on such project.

In order to be effective, a notice of such bond shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein such project is situate prior to the commencement of any work on the project and shall be indexed according to both the street address and the legal description of the property to be improved. The principal contractor shall post a notice on the property that notice of such bond has been filed with the county clerk and recorder and shall make available copies of the bond to every contractor, subcontractor, materialman, mechanic, or laborer upon request.

If any claimant files for record a lien statement or other notice, pursuant to section 38-22-109, such lien shall be deemed released upon the filing for record of a notice executed by both the principal and all sureties acknowledging the existence of the bond furnished for such project and that said lien claimant is entitled to claim the benefits of said bond. Such acknowledgment shall be executed by the principal and sureties upon demand of the owners or any person filing a lien statement. Said notice may be delivered personally to the surety or its agent and the principal or his agent or may be mailed by certified or registered mail. If the principal and all sureties on any such bonds fail or refuse to execute and record such acknowledgment within thirty days after written demand is made upon them, all lien claimants shall be entitled to enforce their lien claims in the same manner as if no bond had been filed as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

In the event that any corporate surety on any bond filed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section becomes subject to an order for relief under the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, is the subject of any state or federal corporate reorganization proceedings, makes any assignment for the benefit of creditors, or otherwise is unable to meet its financial obligations as they become due, the provisions of this section shall not apply, and any lien claimant shall be entitled to enforce such lien claim in the same manner as if no bond had been filed as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1424, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 80:

(5) amended, p. 786, § 14, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 211, § 14, effective August 2.

38-22-130.
Payment of claims by surety.

Subcontractors, materialmen, mechanics, and others who have claims aggregating two thousand dollars or less each on construction projects for the improvement of real property as described in section 38-22-101 (1) for which a bond was executed pursuant to section 38-22-129 shall serve upon the principal contractor and his surety an affidavit, supported by all reasonably available documentary evidence, that a claimant has furnished labor or materials used or performed in the prosecution of the work on such project, that he has been unpaid therefor, and the amount of such claim. If after forty-five days such affidavit remains uncontroverted, such surety shall pay to such claimant forthwith the full value of his claim.

Service of such affidavit may be accomplished by certified or registered mail, by personal delivery to such person, or by leaving a copy at his residence or at his place of business with some person in charge.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1425, § 5, effective October 1.

38-22-131.
Substitution of bond allowed.

Whenever a mechanic’s lien has been filed in accordance with this article, the owner, whether legal or beneficial, of any interest in the property subject to the lien may, at any time, file with the clerk of the district court of the county wherein the property is situated a corporate surety bond or any other undertaking which has been approved by a judge of said district court.

Such bond or undertaking plus costs allowed to date shall be in an amount equal to one and one-half times the amount of the lien plus costs allowed to date and shall be approved by a judge of the district court with which such bond or undertaking is filed.

The bond or undertaking shall be conditioned that, if the lien claimant shall be finally adjudged to be entitled to recover upon the claim upon which his lien is based, the principal or his sureties shall pay to such claimant the amount of his judgment, together with any interest, costs, and other sums which such claimant would be entitled to recover upon the foreclosure of the lien.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1425, § 5, effective October 1.

38-22-132.
Lien to be discharged.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or section 38-35-110, upon court approval of a bond or undertaking as provided in section 38-22-131, and upon the issuance and recording of a certificate of release as specified in this section, the lien against the property, and any notice of lis pendens or notice of the commencement of any action relating to such lien, shall be immediately discharged and released in full; the real property described in such bond or undertaking shall be forever released from the lien, from any notice of lis pendens or notice of the commencement of any action relating to such lien, and from any action brought to foreclose such lien; the bond or undertaking shall be substituted; and no notice of lis pendens or notice of the commencement of any action relating to such lien or any action for the enforcement or foreclosure thereof shall thereafter be recorded against the property. The clerk of the district court with which such bond or undertaking has been filed shall issue a certificate of release which shall be recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county wherein the original mechanic’s lien was filed, and the certificate of release shall show that the property has been forever released from the lien, from any notice of lis pendens or notice of the commencement of any action relating to such lien, and from any action brought to foreclose such lien.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1426, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-264), ch. 279, p. 1250, § 2, effective July 1.

38-22-133.
Action to be brought on bond or undertaking.

When a bond or undertaking is filed as provided in section 38-22-131, the person filing the original mechanic’s lien may bring an action upon the said bond or undertaking. Such action shall be commenced within the time allowed for the commencement of an action upon foreclosure of the lien, and the statute of limitations applicable to a lien foreclosure shall apply to the action upon the bond or undertaking as it would had no bond or undertaking been filed.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1426, § 5, effective October 1.